New York, session 2025-2026, A2603.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 355 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 22 to read as follows: 3 22. The state university trustees shall adopt a policy requiring that 4 each college and university of the state university of New York, exclud- 5 ing community colleges, shall employ staff as follows in the following 6 functional areas: 7 a. for campuses with less than four thousand students and the empire 8 state college, one full-time energy management employee, one full-time 9 materials (waste) management employee, and one full-time sustainability 10 education and engagement employee; 11 b. for campuses with between four thousand students and eleven thou- 12 sand nine hundred ninety-nine students, one full-time and one half-time 13 energy management employee, one full-time and one half-time materials 14 (waste) management employee, and one full-time and one half-time 15 sustainability education and engagement employee; 16 c. for campuses with between twelve thousand students and twenty-four 17 thousand nine hundred ninety-nine students, two full-time energy manage- 18 ment employees, two full-time materials (waste) management employees, 19 and two full-time sustainability education and engagement employees; and 20 d. for campuses with twenty-five thousand or more students, two full- 21 time and one half-time energy management employees, two full-time and 22 one half-time materials (waste) management employees, and two full-time 23 and one half-time sustainability education and engagement employees. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03763-01-5 A. 2603 2 1 § 2. Section 6206 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. The board of trustees shall adopt a policy requiring that each 4 institution of the city university of New York shall employ staff as 5 follows in the following functional areas: 6 a. for campuses with less than four thousand students, one full-time 7 energy management employee, one full-time materials (waste) management 8 employee, and one full-time sustainability education and engagement 9 employee; 10 b. for campuses with between four thousand students and eleven thou- 11 sand nine hundred ninety-nine students, one full-time energy management 12 employee and one full-time employee assigned at least fifty percent to 13 energy management, one full-time materials (waste) management employee 14 and one full-time employee assigned at least fifty percent to materials 15 (waste) management, and one full-time sustainability education and 16 engagement employee and one full-time employee assigned at least fifty 17 percent to sustainability education and engagement; 18 c. for campuses with between twelve thousand students and twenty-four 19 thousand nine hundred ninety-nine students, two full-time energy manage- 20 ment employees, two full-time materials (waste) management employees, 21 and two full-time sustainability education and engagement employees; and 22 d. for campuses with twenty-five thousand or more students, two full- 23 time energy management employees and one full-time employee assigned at 24 least fifty percent to energy management, two full-time materials 25 (waste) management employees and one full-time employee assigned at 26 least fifty percent to materials (waste) management, and two full-time 27 sustainability education and engagement employees and one full-time 28 employee assigned at least fifty percent to sustainability education and 29 engagement. 30 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.